Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 2. Group Life and Health Insurance.

Administrative Code. —

For group health and life insurance, see 2 AAC 39.

Sec. 39.30.090.
Procurement of group insurance.

The Department of Administration may obtain a policy or policies of group insurance covering state employees, persons entitled to coverage under AS

14.25.168

,

14.25.480

, AS

22.25.090

, AS

39.35.535

,

39.35.880

, or former AS 39.37.145, employees of other participating governmental units, or persons entitled to coverage under AS

23.15.136

, subject to the following conditions:

a group insurance policy shall provide one or more of the following benefits: life insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance, weekly indemnity insurance, hospital expense insurance, surgical expense insurance, dental expense insurance, audiovisual insurance, or other medical care insurance;

each eligible employee of the state, the spouse and the unmarried children chiefly dependent on the eligible employee for support, and each eligible employee of another participating governmental unit shall be covered by the group policy, unless exempt under regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration;

a governmental unit may participate under a group policy if

its governing body adopts a resolution authorizing participation and payment of required premiums;

a certified copy of the resolution is filed with the Department of Administration; and

the commissioner of administration approves the participation in writing;

in procuring a policy of group health or group life insurance as provided under this section or excess loss insurance as provided in AS

39.30.091

, the Department of Administration shall comply with the dual choice requirements of AS

21.86.310

, and shall obtain the insurance policy from an insurer authorized to transact business in the state under AS 21.09, a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.87, or a health maintenance organization authorized to operate in this state under AS 21.86; an excess loss insurance policy may be obtained from a life or health insurer authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.09 or from a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.87;

the Department of Administration shall make available bid specifications for desired insurance benefits or for administration of benefit claims and payments to (A) all insurance carriers authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.09 and all hospital or medical service corporations authorized to transact business under AS 21.87 who are qualified to provide the desired benefits; and (B) insurance carriers authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.09, hospital or medical service corporations authorized to transact business under AS 21.87, and third-party administrators licensed to transact business in this state and qualified to provide administrative services; the specifications shall be made available at least once every five years; the lowest responsible bid submitted by an insurance carrier, hospital or medical service corporation, or third-party administrator with adequate servicing facilities shall govern selection of a carrier, hospital or medical service corporation, or third-party administrator under this section or the selection of an insurance carrier or a hospital or medical service corporation to provide excess loss insurance as provided in AS

39.30.091

;

if the aggregate of dividends payable under the group insurance policy exceeds the governmental unit’s share of the premium, the excess shall be applied by the governmental unit for the sole benefit of the employees;

a person receiving benefits under AS

14.25.110

, AS 22.25, AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37 may continue the life insurance coverage that was in effect under this section at the time of termination of employment with the state or participating governmental unit;

a person electing to have insurance under (7) of this subsection shall pay the cost of this insurance;

for each permanent part-time employee electing coverage under this section, the state shall contribute one-half the state contribution rate for permanent full-time state employees, and the permanent part-time employee shall contribute the other one-half;

a person receiving benefits under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37 may obtain auditory, visual, and dental insurance for that person and eligible dependents under this section; the level of coverage for persons over 65 shall be the same as that available before reaching age 65 except that the benefits payable shall be supplemental to any benefits provided under the federal old age, survivors, and disability insurance program; a person electing to have insurance under this paragraph shall pay the cost of the insurance; the commissioner of administration shall adopt regulations implementing this paragraph;

a person receiving benefits under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37 may obtain long-term care insurance for that person and eligible dependents under this section; a person who elects insurance under this paragraph shall pay the cost of the insurance premium; the commissioner of administration shall adopt regulations to implement this paragraph;

each licensee holding a current operating agreement for a vending facility under AS

23.15.010

—

23.15.210

shall be covered by the group policy that applies to governmental units other than the state.

In this section,

“eligible employee” means

an employee who has served in permanent full-time or part-time employment with the same governmental unit for 30 days or more, except an emergency or temporary employee;

an elected or appointed official of a governmental unit, effective upon taking the oath of office; and

a contractual employee of the legislative branch of state government under AS

24.10.060(f)

if the employee’s personal services contract provides that the employee is entitled to coverage;

“governmental unit” means the state, a municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of the state, and the North Pacific Fishery Management Council;

“insurance”, “insurance carrier” and “insurance policy” include health care services, health care service contractors and contracts, and health maintenance organizations.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 151 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 168 SLA 1959; am §§ 1, 2 ch 105 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1968; am § 66 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 159 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 46 SLA 1973; am §§ 13, 14 ch 47 SLA 1974; am §§ 2, 3 ch 27 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1977; am § 39 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1981; am § 37 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1984; am §§ 13, 14 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 95 SLA 1990; am §§ 67 — 69 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 106 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 1998; am § 69 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 30 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly AS

39.30.100

. Renumbered in 1987.

Cross references. —

For the purpose of the 1978 amendatory act, see § 1, ch. 177, SLA 1978 as amended by § 7, ch. 46, SLA 1982, in the 1982 Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves. For limited enrollment period for certain previously ineligible persons to apply for coverage under paragraph (7) of this section, see § 2, ch. 46, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For legislative intent concerning the 1998 amendment to paragraph (b)(1), see § 1, ch. 22, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For employment-related benefits for same-sex partners of state employees and retirees under the state’s retirement systems, see 2 AAC 38.

For long-term care insurance, see 2 AAC 39, art. 1.

For dental-vision-audio insurance, see 2 AAC 39, art. 2.

For major medical insurance, see 2 AAC 39, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, made stylistic changes throughout.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Because health insurance deals with the economic interests of employees and does not deal with fundamental policy, because this section, the group insurance statute, authorizes the Department of Administration to obtain “a policy or policies”, and because this section does not specify what levels of coverage or benefits must be included in the policy (or policies) obtained, the issue of group life and health insurance benefits is negotiable under the Public Employment Relations Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

).
Jan. 23, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

To the extent the cost of negotiated group life and health insurance coverage exceeds what the state would have paid under its employer-sponsored plan, the negotiated coverage is subject to legislative approval under AS

23.40.215

.
Jan. 23, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.30.091.
Authorization for self-insurance and excess loss insurance.

Notwithstanding AS

21.86.310

or AS

39.30.090

, the Department of Administration may provide, by means of self-insurance, one or more of the benefits listed in AS

39.30.090(a)(1)

for state employees eligible for the benefits by law or under a collective bargaining agreement and for persons receiving benefits under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37, and their dependents. The department shall procure any necessary excess loss insurance under AS

39.30.090

.

History.

(§ 69 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 27 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 39.30.095.
Group health and life benefits fund.

The commissioner of administration shall establish the group health and life benefits fund as a special account in the general fund to provide for group life and health insurance under AS

39.30.090

and

39.30.160

or for self-insurance arrangements under AS

39.30.091

. The commissioner shall maintain accounts and records for the fund. The fund consists of employer contributions, employee contributions, appropriations from the legislature, and income earned on investment of the fund as provided in (d) of this section.

After obtaining the advice of an actuary, the commissioner of administration shall determine the amount necessary to provide benefits under AS

39.30.090

,

39.30.091

, and

39.30.160

and, subject to (e) of this section, shall set the rate of employer contribution and employee contribution, if any. With money in the fund, the commissioner of administration shall pay premiums, claims, and administrative costs required under the insurance policies in effect under AS

39.30.090

and

39.30.160

, or required under self-insurance arrangements in effect under AS

39.30.091

.

The commissioner of administration or the designee of the commissioner is administrator of the fund. The commissioner may contract with

an insurer authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.09, or a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.87 to reimburse the state for the cost of administering group insurance provided under AS

39.30.090

and

39.30.160

; and

a life or health insurer authorized to transact business in the state under AS 21.09, a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.87, or a third-party administrator licensed to transact business in this state for the administration of benefit claims and payments under AS

39.30.091

.

If the commissioner of administration determines that there is more money in the fund than the amount needed to pay premiums, benefits, and administrative costs for the current fiscal year, the surplus, or so much of it as the commissioner of administration considers advisable, may be invested by the commissioner of revenue in the same manner as retirement funds are invested under AS

37.10.220

.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the rate of employer contribution to provide hospital, surgical, dental, audiovisual, and other medical care benefits under AS

39.30.091

is $515 monthly beginning July 1, 2000; $575 monthly beginning July 1, 2001; and $630 monthly beginning July 1, 2002, for the following employees and officials:

employees in the executive branch of the state government, including the governor and lieutenant governor, who are not members of a collective bargaining unit established under the authority of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act);

officials and employees of the legislative branch of state government under AS 24;

employees in the judicial branch of state government, including magistrates and other judicial officers, who are not members of a collective bargaining unit established under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act).

In this section, “fund” means the group health and life benefits fund.

History.

(§ 38 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 57 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 27, 28 ch 141 SLA 1988; am §§ 70 — 73 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 107 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 6, 7 ch 2 TSSLA 2000; am § 70 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f).
Relettered in 2000, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (f) and a conforming amendment was made in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 39.30.096.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 39.30.097.
Alaska retiree health care trusts.

The commissioner of administration is authorized to prefund medical benefits provided by AS

14.25.168

, AS

22.25.090

, and AS

39.35.535

by establishing an irrevocable trust that is exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. 115 and subject to the applicable financial reporting, disclosure, and actuarial requirements of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board.

The commissioner of administration is authorized to prefund medical benefits provided by AS

14.25.480

, AS

39.30.300

, and AS

39.35.880

by establishing an irrevocable trust that is exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. 115 and subject to the applicable financial reporting, disclosure, and actuarial requirements of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board.

The plans and assets of the Alaska retiree health care trusts shall be under the governance and investment authority of the Alaska Retirement Management Board, which shall serve as trustee of the trust as provided in AS

37.10.210

. The commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee shall serve as administrator of the Alaska retiree health care trusts.

All employer contributions, appropriations, earnings, and reserves for the payment of retiree medical obligations shall be credited to the retiree health care trusts. The prefunded amounts shall be available without fiscal year limitations for retiree medical benefits and administration costs. The amounts remaining in the trusts, if any, after retiree medical benefits and administration costs have been paid in any year shall be retained in the trusts for future payments until the satisfaction of all employer liabilities under the trusts for retiree medical benefits. All prefunded amounts shall be used solely for the payment of retiree medical benefits and administration costs and for no other purpose.

The assets of the Alaska retiree health care trusts may be pooled, for investment purposes, with assets of the retirement systems, so long as such assets are accounted for separately.

History.

(§ 50 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For provision directing the commissioner of administration to transfer to the retiree health care trusts established under this section the funds that have been deposited in the group health and life benefits fund under AS

39.30.095

, including funds in the retiree health insurance fund and retiree health benefit funds that may be held in other accounts, see § 118, ch. 20, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans and to retiree medical and health care benefits to be administered under this section, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.30.098.
Regulations.

The commissioner of administration may adopt regulations to implement AS

39.30.090

—

39.30.097

. Regulations adopted by the commissioner under this section relate to the internal management of state agencies, and their adoption is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 50 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.30.100.
[Renumbered as AS 39.30.090(b).]